Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5
SCHOLARSHIP AND GRANT PROGRAM

23-3.3-501. Scholarship and grant program - funding.

The commission shall use a portion of any moneys remaining after meeting the requirements of parts 2 and 3 of this article to provide other programs of financial assistance based upon financial need, merit, talent, or other criteria established by the commission for students enrolled at institutions.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 829, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 791, § 8, effective July 1.